Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.300

Benefits offset by workers' compensation or similar benefits.

Any amounts which may be paid or payable under the provisions of any workers' compensation, or pension, or similar law on account of any disability shall be offset against and payable in lieu of any benefits payable from funds provided by the employer under the provisions of this chapter on account of the same disability.

[ 1987 c 185 s 14; 1949 c 240 s 21; 1947 c 274 s 31; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 11072-31.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—1987 c 185: See notes following RCW 51.12.130.